test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-С_С-слово_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - слово M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      слово+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: сло́во
      слово+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: сло́во
      слово+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: сло́ва
      слово+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: сло́ве
      слово+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: сло́ву
      слово+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: сло́вом
      слово+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: слова́
      слово+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: слова́
      слово+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: сло́в
      слово+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: слова́х
      слово+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: слова́м
      слово+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: слова́ми
